West Virginia, session 2026, HB4884.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 13. GUIDELINES FOR CHILD SUPPORT AWARDS. PART 2. CALCULATION OF CHILD SUPPORT ORDER. §48-13-201. Use of both parents' income in determining child support. A child support order is determined by dividing the total child support obligation between the parents in proportion to their income. Both parents' adjusted gross income net pay is used to determine the amount of child support. §48-13-202. Application of expenses and credits in determining child support. In determining the total child support obligation, the court shall:(1) Add to the basic child support obligation any unreimbursed child health care expenses, work-related child care expenses and any other extraordinary expenses agreed to by the parents or ordered by the court; and(2) Subtract any extraordinary credits agreed to by the parents or ordered by the court.(3)  Deduct from a parent’s adjusted gross income net pay the reasonable monthly amount of a student loan payment actually being paid to the lending institution that originally issued the loan by a parent for a student loan debt owed in his or her own name and for his or her own educational expenses; provided that the total amount of the student loan payment deducted may not exceed 25 percent of the parent’s total gross income net pay determined before the deduction.   The family court shall have discretion to exclude all or a portion of the student loan deduction if the parent with the student loan debt is in child support arrears, if the parent is not current or is in arrears on the student loan payment, if the student loan is being paid by a third party and not the parent, or if the child is not receiving or expected to receive a financial benefit from the education associated with the student loan expenses incurred.   If the student loan deduction is awarded:(a) The parent shall have a duty to immediately disclose to the court, the BCSE, and any other party any changes in the monthly amount of the student loan payment, including any payment deferrals or student loan forgiveness. (b) The court may require a parent to annually disclose to the court, the BCSE, and any other party a statement showing a history of student loan payments for the prior year.(c)  Failure to timely make the disclosures above may be a basis for the court to modify child support to exclude the student loan deduction, including retroactively to the first of the month following any unreported change.Part III. Basic child support order. Part 3. Basic child support order. §48-13-301. Determining the basic child support obligation. The basic child support obligation is determined from the following table of monthly basic child support obligations: West VirginiaMonthly Basic Child Support Obligations(Adjusted for West Virginia's Income Relative to U.S. Averages) COMBINED GROSS NET PAYMONTHLY INCOMEONECHILDTWO CHILDRENTHREE CHILDRENFOUR CHILDRENFIVE CHILDRENSIX CHILDREN 550 101 153 185 207 228 247 600 110 167 202 226 248 270 650 119 181 219 244 269 292 700 128 195 235 263 289 314 750 137 208 252 281 310 337 800 146 222 269 300 330 359 850 155 236 285 319 351 381 900 164 250 302 337 371 403 950 173 264 319 356 392 426 1000 182 277 335 375 412 448 1050 191 291 352 393 432 470 1100 200 304 368 411 452 491 1150 208 316 382 427 470 510 1200 216 328 397 443 488 530 1250 223 340 411 460 506 549 1300 231 352 426 476 523 569 1350 239 365 441 492 541 589 1400 247 377 455 509 563 608 1450 255 389 470 525 577 628 1500 263 401 485 541 595 647 1550 271 413 499 558613 667 1600 279425 514 574 631 686 1650 287 437 528 590 649 706 1700 295 449 543 607 667 725 1750 303 461 558 623 685 745 1800 311 473 572 639 703 764 1850 319 485 587 656 721 784 1900 327 498 602 672 739 803 1950 335 510 616 688 757 823 2000 342 521 630 704 774 842 2050 350 533 645 720 792 861 2100 358 545 659 736 809 880 2150 366 557 673 752 827 899 2200 373 569687 768 844 918 2250 381 580 702 784 862 937 2300 389 592 716 799 879 956 2350 396 604 730 815 897 975 2400 404 615 744 831 914 994 2450 412 627 758 847 932 1013 2500 420 639 772 863 949 1031 2550 427 651 786 878 966 1050 2600 435 662 801 894 984 1069 2650 443674 815 910 1001 1088 2700 450 686 829 923 1018 1107 2750 458 697 843 942 1036 1126 2800 466 709 857 958 1053 1145 2850 473 721 871 973 1071 1164 2900 481 733 886 989 1088 1183 2950 489 744 900 1005 1105 1202 3000 496 756 914 1021 1123 1221 3050 504 768 928 1037 1140 1239 3100 512 779 942 1052 1158 1258 3150 520 791 956 1068 1175 1277 3200 527 803 970 1084 1192 1296 3250 535 814 985 1100 1210 1315 3300 543 826 999 1116 1227 1334 3350 550 838 1013 1131 1245 1353 3400 558 850 1027 1147 1262 1372 3450 566 861 1041 1163 1279 1391 3500 573 873 1055 1179 1297 1410 3550 581 885 1069 1194 1314 1428 3600 588 896 1083 1210 1331 1447 3650 596 907 1097 1225 1348 1465 3700 603 919 1111 1241 1365 1484 3750 611 930 1124 1255 1381 1501 3800 619 940 1135 1268 1395 1516 3850 626 950 1146 1281 1409 1531 3900 634 960 1158 1293 1423 1546 3950 641 970 1169 1306 1437 1562 4000 649 979 1181 1319 1451 1577 4050 656 989 1192 1331 1465 1592 4100 664 999 1203 1344 1479 1607 4150 671 1009 1215 1357 1493 1622 4200 679 1019 1226 1370 1507 1638 4250 686 1029 1238 1382 1521 1653 4300 694 1039 1249 1395 1535 1668 4350 701 1049 1260 1408 1549 1683 4400 708 1060 1274 1423 1565 1701 4450 715 1071 1287 1437 1581 1719 4500 722 1083 1300 1452 1597 1736 4550 729 1094 1313 1467 1613 1754 4600 7351104  1325 1480 1628 1769 4650 741 1113 1336 1492 1642 1785 4700 747 1123 1348 1505 1656 1800 4750 752 1132 1359 1518 1670 1815 4800 758 1142 1370 1531 1684 1830 4850 764 1152 1382 1543 1698 1845 4900 770 1161 1393 1556 1712 1861 4950 776 1171 1404 1569 1726 1876 5000 782 1181 1416 1581 1740 1891 5050 787 1189 1426 1593 1752 1905 5100 792 1197 1435 1602 1763 1916 5150 797 1204 1443 1612 1773 1927 5200 802 1211 1452 1621 1784 1939 5250 807 1218 1460 1631 1794 1950 5300 811 1225 1468 1640 1804 1961 5350 816 1232 1477 1650 1815 1973 5400 821 1239 1485 1659 1825 1984 5450 826 1246 1494 1668 1835 1995 5500 830 1254 1502 1678 1846 2006 5550 835 1261 1511 1687 1856 2018 5600 840 1268 1519 1697 1866 2029 5650 845 1275 1527 1706 1877 2040 5700 850 1282 1536 1716 1887 2051 5750 854 1289 1544 1725 1897 2063 5800 857 1293 1549 1731 1904 2069 5850 860 1298 1554 1736 1909 2076 5900 863 1302 1559 1741 1915 2082 5950 866 1306 1564 1747 1921 2088 6000 869 1310 1568 1752 1927 2095 6050 872 1315 1573 1757 1933 2101 6100 875 1319 1578 1763 1939 2107 6150 878 1323 1583 1768 1945 2114 6200 881 1327 1587 1773 1951 2120 6250 884 1331 1592 1779 1956 2127 6300 887 1336 1597 1784 1962 2133 6350 890 1340 1602 1789 1968 2139 6400 893 1344 1607 1795 1974 2146 6450 895 1348 1611 1800 1980 2152 6500 898 1352 1615 1804 1984 2157 6550 901 1355 1617 1807 1987 2160 6600 904 1358 1620 1809 1990 2164 6650 906 1361 1622 1812 1993 2167 6700 909 1364 1625 1815 1997 2170 6750 911 1367 1627 1818 2000 2174 6800 914 1370 1630 1821 2003 2177 6850 917 1373 1632 1823 2006 2180 6900 919 1376 1635 1826 2009 2183 6950 922 1379 1637 1829 2012 2187 7000 925 1382 1640 1832 2015 2190 7050 927 1385 1642 1834 2018 2193 7100 930 1388 1645 1837 2021 2197 7150 933 1391 1647 1840 2024 2200 7200 935 1395 1650 1843 2027 2204 7250 939 1401 1658 1852 2038 2215 7300 943 1407 1667 1861 2048 2226 7350 946 1413 1675 1871 2058 2237 7400 950 1419 1683 1880 2068 2248 7450 954 1426 1691 1889 2078 2259 7500 957 1432 1699 1898 2088 2270 7550 961 1438 1708 1907 2098 2281 7600 965 1444 1716 1917 2108 2292 7650 969 1450 1724 1926 2118 2303 7700 972 1457 1732 1935 2129 2314 7750 976 1463 1741 1944 2139 2325 7800 980 1469 1749 1953 2149 2336 7850 983 1475 1757 1963 2159 2347 7900 987 1482 1765 1972 2169 2358 7950 990 1485 1770 1977 2174 2364 8000 992 1488 1772 1979 2177 2366 8050 994 1491 1774 1981 2180 2369 8100 997 1493 1776 1984 2182 2372 8150 999 1496 1778 1986 2185 2375 8200 1001 1498 1780 1988 2187 2378 8250 1003 1501 1782 1991 2190 2380 8300 1006 1503 1784 1993 2192 2383 8350 1008 1506 1786 1995 2195 2386 8400 1010 1509 1788 1998 2198 2389 8450 1012 1511 1791 2000 2200 2391 8500 1014 1514 1793 2002 2203 2394 8550 1017 1516 1795 2005 2205 2397 8600 1019 1519 1797 2007 2208 2400 8650 1021 1521 1799 2009 2210 2403 8700 1024 1525 1803 2014 2215 2408 8750 1027 1529 1807 2018 2220 2413 8800 1030 1533 1811 2023 2225 2419 8850 1033 1537 1815 2027 2230 2424 8900 1036 1541 1819 2032 2235 2430 8950 1039 1545 1823 2036 2240 2435 9000 1042 1549 1827 2041 2245 2440 9050 1045 1553 1831 2045 2250 2446 9100 1048 1557 1835 2050 2255 2451 9150 1051 1561 1839 2054 2260 2456 9200 1054 1565 1843 2059 2265 2462 9250 1057 1569 1847 2063 2270 2467 9300 1060 1573 1851 2068 2275 2473 9350 1063 1577 1855 2072 2280 2478 9400 1067 1581 1860 2077 2285 2484 9450 1071 1588 1867 2085 2294 2493 9500 1076 1594 1874 2093 2302 2503 9550 1080 1600 1881 2101 2311 2512 9600 1085 1607 1888 2109 2320 2521 9650 1089 1613 1895 2116 2328 2531 9700 1094 1619 1902 2124 2337 2540 9750 1098 1626 1909 2132 2345 2549 9800 1103 1632 1916 2140 2354 2559 9850 1107 1638 1923 2148 2363 2568 9900 1112 1645 1930 2156 2371 2577 9950 1116 1651 1937 2163 2380 2587 10000 1121 1657 1944 2171 2388 2596 10050 1125 1663 1951 2179 2397 2605 10100 1130 1670 1958 2187 2405 2615 10150 1134 1676 1965 2195 2414 2624 10200 1139 1682 1972 2202 2423 2633 10250 1143 1689 1979 2210 2431 2643 10300 1148 1695 1986 2218 2440 2652 10350 1152 1701 1993 2226 2448 2661 10400 1157 1708 2000 2234 2457 2671 10450 1161 1714 2007 2241 2466 2680 10500 1166 1720 2014 2249 2474 2689 10550 1169 1726 2021 2257 2483 2699 10600 1172 1731 2028 2265 2492 2708 10650 1176 1737 2035 2273 2500 2718 10700 1179 1742 2042 2281 2509 2727 10750 1182 1748 2049 2289 2517 2737 10800 1186 1753 2056 2296 2526 2746 10850 1189 1758 2063 2304 2535 2755 10900 1192 1764 2070 2312 2543 2765 10950 1195 1769 2077 2320 2552 2774 11000 1199 1775 2084 2328 2561 2784 11050 1202 1780 2091 2336 2569 2793 11100 1205 1785 2098 2344 2578 2802 11150 1209 1791 2105 2352 2587 2812 11200 1212 1796 2112 2359 2595 2821 11250 1215 1802 2119 2367 2604 2831 11300 1219 1807 2126 2375 2613 2840 11350 1222 1813 2133 2383 2621 2849 11400 1225 1818 2140 2391 2630 2859 11450 1228 1823 2148 2399 2639 2868 11500 1232 1829 2155 2407 2647 2878 11550 1235 1834 2162 2415 2656 2887 11600 1238 1840 2169 2422 2665 2896 11650 1241 1844 2174 2429 2672 2904 11700 1244 1848 2178 2433 2676 2909 11750 1246 1851 2182 2437 2681 2914 11800 1249 1855 2186 2442 2686 2920 11850 1251 1858 2190 2446 2691 2925 11900 1254 1862 2194 2450 2696 2930 11950 1257 1866 2198 2455 2700 2935 12000 1259 1869 2202 2459 2705 2941 12050 1262 1873 2206 2464 2710 2946 12100 1264 1876 2209 2468 2715 2951 12150 1267 1880 2213 2472 2720 2956 12200 1269 1883 2217 2477 2724 2961 12250 1272 1887 2222 2482 2730 2967 12300 1275 1891 2225 2486 2734 2972 12350 1278 1895 2230 2491 2740 2978 12400 1280 1899 2234 2495 2745 2984 12450 1283 1903 2238 2500 2750 2990 12500 1286 1907 2243 2505 2756 2995 12550 1289 1911 2247 2510 2761 3001 12600 1292 1914 2251 2515 2766 3007 12650 1295 1918 2256 2520 2771 3013 12700 1297 1922 2260 2524 2777 3018 12750 1301 1927 2265 2530 2783 3025 12800 1305 1932 2270 2535 2789 3032 12850 1308 1937 2275 2541 2795 3038 12900 1312 1942 2280 2547 2801 3045 12950 1316 1946 2285 2552 2807 3052 13000 1319 1951 2290 2558 2813 3058 13050 1323 1956 2295 2563 2819 3065 13100 1326 1961 2300 2569 2826 3071 13150 1330 1966 2305 2574 2832 3078 13200 1334 1971 2310 2580 2838 3085 13250 1337 1975 2315 2585 2844 3091 13300 1341 1980 2320 2591 2850 3098 13350 1345 1985 2325 2596 2856  3105 13400 1348 1990 2329 2602 2862 3111 134501352 1995 2334 2608 2868 3118 13500 1355 1999 2339 2613 2874 3125 13550 1359 2004 2344 2619 2881 3131 13600 1363 2009 2349 2624 2887 3138 13650 1366 2014 2354 2630 2893 3144 13700 1370 2019 2359 2635 2899 3151 13750 1374 2024 2364 2641 2905 3158 13800 1377 2028 2369 2646 2911 3164 13850 1381 2033 2374 2652 2917 3171 13900 1385 2038 2379 2658 2923 3178 13950 1388 2043 2384 2663 2929 3184 14000 1392 2048 2389 2669 2935 3191 14050 1395 2053 2394 2674 2942 3198 14100 1398 2056 2397 2678 2945 3202 14150 1400 2059 2400 2681 2949 3205 14200 1403 2061 2403 2684 2952 3209 14250 1405 2064 2405 2687 2956 3213 14300 1407 2067 2408 2690 2959 3216 14350 1409 2070 2411 2693 2962 3220 14400 1412 2073 2414 2696 2966 3224 14450 1414 2076 2417 2699 2969 3227 14500 1416 2079 2419 2702 2973 3231 14550 1419 2082 2422 2705 2976 3235 14600 1421 2085 2425 2709 2979 3239 14650 1423 2088 2428 2712 2983 3242 14700 1426 2091 2430 2715 2986 3246 14750 1428 2093  2433 2718 2990 3250 14800 1430 2096 2436 2721 2993 3253 14850 1433 2099 2439 2724 2996 3257 14900 1435 2102 2442 2727 3000 3261 14950 1437 2105 2444 2730 3003 3265 15000 1439 2108 2447 2733 3007 3268 15050144221112450273630103272 15100144421142453274030143276 15150144621172455274330173279 15200144921202458274630203283 15250145121232461274930243287 15300145321252463275230273290 15350145521282466275430303293 15400145721302468275730333297 15450146021342472276130383302 15500146421392479276930463311 15550146721452485277630543319 15600147121512492278430623328 15650147521562499279130703337 15700147921622505279830783346 15750148221672512280630863355 15800148621732518281330943363 15850149021792525282031023372 15900149421842531282831103381 15950149721902538283531183390 16000150121952545284231273399 16050150522012551285031353407 16100150922072558285731433416 16150151322122564286431513425 16200151622182571287231593434 16250152022232577287931673442 16300152422292584288631753451 16350152822342591289431833460 16400153122402597290131913469 16450153522462604290831993478 16500153922512610291632073486 16550154322572617292332153495 16600154622622624293032243504 16650155022682630293832323513 16700155422742637294532403522 16750155822792643295232483530 16800156122852650296032563539 16850156522902656296732633547 16900156922962663297432713556 16950157323012669298132793565 17000157623072675298932873573 17050158023122682299632953582 17100158423182688300333033591 17150158723232695301033113599 17200159123292701301733193608 17250159523342708302533273617 17300159923402714303233353625 17350160223452721303933433634 17400160623512727304633513643 17450161023562734305433593651 17500161323622740306133673660 17550161723672747306833753669 17600162123732753307533833677 17650162523782760308333913686 17700162823842766309033993695 17750163223892773309734073703 17800163523932777310234123709 17850163823972781310634173714 17900164124012785311134223719 17950164424052789311534273725 18000164724092793312034323730 18050165024132797312434363735 18100165324172801312934413741 18150165624202805313334463746 18200165924242809313834513752 18250166224282813314234563757 18300166524322817314634613762 18350166824362821315134663768 18400167024402825315534713773 18450167324442829316034763778 18500167624482833316434813784 18550167924522837316934863789 18600168224562841317334913794 18650168524602845317834963800 18700168824642849318235013805 18750169124672853318735053810 18800169424712857319135103816 18850169724752861319635153821 18900170024792865320035203827 18950170324832869320535253832 19000170624872873320935303837 19050170924912877321435353843 19100171224952881321835403848 19150171524982885322235453853 19200171725022889322735493858 19250172025062892323135543863 19300172325102896323535593868 19350172625132900323935633873 19400172925172904324435683878 19450173225212908324835733883 19500173425242911325235773889 19550173725282915325635823894 19600174025322919326135873899 19650174325362923326535913904 19700174625392927326935963909 19750174825432931327336013914 19800175125472934327836053919 19850175425502938328236103924 19900175725542942328636153929 19950176025582946329036193934 20000176225622950329536243939 20050176525652953329936293945 20100176825692957330336333950 20150177125732961330736383955 20200177425762965331236433960 20250177625802969331636483965 20300177925842972332036523970 20350178225882976332436573975 20400178525912980332936623980 20450178825952984333336663985 20500179125992988333736713990 20550179326022991334136763995 20600179626062995334636804000 20650179926102999335036854006 20700180226143003335436904011 20750180526173007335836944016 20800180726213011336336994021 20850181026253014336737044026 20900181326283018337137084031 20950181626323022337537134036 21000181826363027338137194043 21050182126403033338837264051 21100182326453039339437334058 21150182626493044340037404066 21200182826533050340737474074 21250183126573056341337554081 21300183326623061342037624089 21350183626663067342637694096 21400183826703073343237764104 21450184126743079343937834112 21500184326793084344537904119 21550184626833090345237974127 21600184826873096345838044135 21650185026913101346438114142 21700185326963107347138184150 21750185527003113347738254158 21800185827043119348338324165 21850186027083124349038394173 21900186327133130349638464181 21950186527173136350338534188 22000186827213142350938604196 22050187027253147351538674203 22100187327303153352238744211 22150187527343159352838814219 22200187827383164353538884226 22250188027423170354138954234 22300188327473176354739024242 22350188527513182355439094249 22400188827553187356039164257 22450189027593193356739234265 22500189227643199357339304272 22550189527683204357939374280 22600189727723210358639444288 22650190027763216359239514295 22700190227813222359939584303 22750190527853227360539654310 22800190727893233361139724318 22850191027933239361839794326 22900191227983245362439874333 22950191528023250363139944341 23000191728063256363740014349 23050192028103262364340084356 23100192228143267365040154364 23150192528193273365640224372 23200192728233279366240294379 23250193028273285366940364387 23300193228313290367540434394 23350193428363296368240504402 23400193728403302368840574410 23450193928443307369440644417 23500194228483313370140714425 23550194428533319370740784433 23600194728573325371440854440 23650194928613330372040924448 23700195228653336372640994456 23750195428703342373341064463 23800195728743348373941134471 23850195928783353374641204479 23900196228823359375241274486 23950196428873365375841344494 24000196728913370376541414501 24050196928953376377141484509 24100197228993382377841554517 24150197429043388378441624524 24200197629083393379041694532 24250197929123399379741764540 24300198129163405380341834547 24350198429213410380941904555 24400198629253416381641974563 24450198929293422382242044570 24500199129333428382942124578 24550199429383433383542194586 24600199629423439384142264593 24650199929463445384842334601 24700200129503451385442404608 24750200429553456386142474616 24800200629593462386742544624 24850200929633468387342614631 24900201129673473388042684639 24950201329723479388642754647 25000201629763485389342824654 25050201829803491389942894662 25100202129843496390542964670 25150202329883502391243034677 25200202629933508391843104685 25250202829973513392543174693 25300203130013519393143244700 25350203330053525393743314708 25400203630103531394443384715 25450203830143536395043454723 25500204130183542395643524731 25550204330223548396343594738 25600204630273554396943664746 25650204830313559397643734754 25700205130353565398243804761 25750205330393571398843874769 25800205530443576399543944777 25850205830483582400144014784 25900206030523588400744084792 25950206330563592401244134797 26000206630593596401744184803 26050206830633600402144234808 26100207130673604402644284814 26150207330703608403044344819 26200207630743612403544394825 26250207830783617404044444830 26300208130813621404444494836 26350208330853625404944544841 26400208630893629405444594847 26450208930923633405844644852 26500209130963637406344694858 26550209431003641406844744864 26600209631033646407244794869 26650209931073650407744844875 26700210131113654408144904880 26750210431143658408644954886 26800210731183662409145004891 26850210931223666409545054897 26900211231253671410045104902 26950211431293675410545154908 27000211731333679410945204913 27050211931363683411445254919 27100212231403687411845304924 27150212531443691412345354930 27200212731473695412845414936 27250213031513700413245464941 27300213231553704413745514947 27350213531583708414245564952 27400213731623712414645614958 27450214031663716415145664963 27500214231693720415645714969 27550214531733724416045764974 27600214831773729416545814980 27650215031803733416945864985 27700215331843737417445914991 27750215531883741417945974996 27800215831913745418346025002 27850216031953749418846075008 27900216331993753419346125013 27950216632023758419746175019 28000216832063762420246225024 28050217132103766420646275030 28100217332133770421146325035 28150217632173774421646375041 28200217832213778422046425046 28250218132243782422546475052 28300218332283787423046535057 28350218632323791423446585063 28400218932353795423946635068 28450219132393799424446685074 28500219432433803424846735079 28550219632463807425346785085 28600219932503811425746835091 28650220132543816426246885096 28700220432573820426746935102 28750220732613824427146985107 28800220932653828427647045113 28850221232683832428147095118 28900221432723836428547145124 28950221732763840429047195129 29000221932793845429447245135 29050222232833849429947295140 29100222432873853430447345146 29150222732903857430847395151 29200223032943861431347445157 29250223232983865431847495163 29300223533013869432247545168 29350223733053874432747605174 29400224033093878433147655179 29450224233123882433647705185 29500224533163886434147755190 29550224833203890434547805196 29600225033233894435047855201 29650225333273899435547905207 29700225533313903435947955212 29750225833343907436448005218 29800226033383911436948055223 29850226333423915437348105229 29900226633453919437848165235 29950226833493923438248215240 30000227133533928438748265246 30050227333563932439248315251 30100227633603936439648365257 30150227833643940440148415262 30200228133673944440648465268 30250228333713948441048515273 30300228633753952441548565279 30350228933783957441948615284 30400229133823961442448675290 30450229433863965442948725295 30500229633893969443348775301 30550229933933973443848825307 30600230133973977444348875312 30650230434003981444748925318 30700230734043986445248975323 30750230934083990445749025329 30800231234113994446149075334 30850231434153998446649125340 30900231734194002447049175345 30950231934224006447549235351 31000232234264010448049285356 31050232434304015448449335362 31100232734334019448949385367 31150233034374023449449435373 31200233234414027449849485378 31250233534444031450349535384 31300233734484035450749585390 31350234034524039451249635395 31400234234554044451749685401 31450234534594048452149735406 31500234834634052452649795412 31550235034664056453149845417 31600235334704060453549895423 31650235534744064454049945428 31700235834774068454449995434 31750236034814073454950045439 31800236334854077455450095445 31850236534884081455850145450 31900236834924085456350195456 31950237134964089456850245462 32000237334994093457250305467 32050237635034098457750355473 32100237835074102458250405478 32150238135104106458650455484 32200238335144110459150505489 32250238635184114459550555495 32300238935214118460050605500 32350239135254122460550655506 32400239435294127460950705511 32450239635324131461450755517 32500239935364135461950805522 32550240135404139462350865528 32600240435434143462850915534 32650240735474147463250965539 32700240935504151463751015545 32750241235544156464251065550 32800241435584160464651115556 32850241735614164465151165561 32900241935654168465651215567 32950242235694172466051265572 33000242435724176466551315578 33050242735764180467051365583 33100243035804185467451425589 33150243235834189467951475594 33200243535874193468351525600 33250243735914197468851575606 33300244035944201469351625611 33350244235984205469751675617 33400244536024209470251725622 33450244836054214470751775628 33500245036094218471151825633 33550245336134222471651875639 33600245536164226472051935644 33650245836204230472551985650 33700246036244234473052035655 33750246336274238473452085661 33800246536314243473952135666 33850246836354247474452185672 33900247136384251474852235677 33950247336424255475352285683 34000247636464259475852335689 34050247836494263476252385694 34100248136534267476752435700 34150248336574272477152495705 34200248636604276477652545711 34250248936644280478152595716 34300249136684284478552645722 34350249436714288479052695727 34400249636754292479552745733 34450249936794296479952795738 34500250136824301480452845744 34550250436864305480852895749 34600250636904309481352945755 34650250936934313481852995761 34700251236974317482253055766 34750251437014321482753105772 34800251737044326483253155777 34850251937084330483653205783 34900252237124334484153255788 34950252437154338484553305794 35000252737194342485053355799 §48-13-302. Incomes below the table for determining basic child support obligations. If combined adjusted gross income net pay is below $550 per month, which is the lowest amount of income considered in the table of monthly basic child support obligations set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the basic child support obligation shall be set at $50 per month or a discretionary amount determined by the court based on the resources and living expenses of the parents and the number of children due support. §48-13-303. Incomes above the table for determining basic child support obligations. If combined adjusted gross income net pay is above $35,000 per month, which is the highest amount of income considered in the table of monthly basic child support obligations set forth in §48-13-301 of this code, the basic child support obligation shall not be less than it would be based on a combined adjusted gross income net pay of $35,000. The court may also compute the basic child support obligation for combined adjusted gross incomes net pay above $35,000 by the following:(1) One child — $2,527 + 0.088 x combined adjusted gross income net pay above $35,000 per month;(2) Two children — $3,719 + 0.129 x combined adjusted gross income net pay above $35,000 per month;(3) Three children — $4,342 + 0.153 x combined adjusted gross income net pay above $35,000 per month;(4) Four children — $4,850 + 0.169 x combined adjusted gross income net pay above $35,000 per month;(5) Five children — $5,335 + 0.183 x combined adjusted gross income net pay above $35,000 per month; and(6) Six children — $5,799 + 0.196 x combined adjusted gross income net pay above $35,000 per month.Part IV. Support in sole custody cases. Part 4. Support in sole custody cases. §48-13-403. Worksheet for calculating basic child support obligation in basic shared parenting cases. Child support for basic shared parenting cases shall be calculated using the following worksheet:Worksheet A: BASIC SHARED PARENTINGIN THE FAMILY COURT OF __________ COUNTY, WEST VIRGINIACASE NO.____________Mother: ______________ SS No.: _____________ Primary Custodial parent? [ ] Yes [ ] NoFather: ______________ SS No.: _____________ Primary Custodial parent? [ ] Yes [ ] No ChildrenSSNDate of BirthChildrenSSNDate of Birth PART I. CHILD SUPPORT ORDERMotherFatherCombined 1. MONTHLY GROSS NET PAY INCOME    (Exclusive of overtime compensation)$$ a. Minus preexisting child support payment-- b. Minus maintenance paid-- c. Plus overtime compensation, if not excluded, and not to exceed 50%, pursuant to W. Va. Code §48-1-228(b)(6)++ d. Additional dependents deduction-- e. Minus student loan payment pursuant to W. Va. Code §48-13-202(3) 2. MONTHLY ADJUSTED GROSS NET PAYINCOME $$$ 3. PERCENTAGE SHARE OF INCOME (Each parent's income from line 2 divided by Combined Income)%% 100% 4. BASIC OBLIGATION (Use Line 2 combined to find amount from schedule.)  $ 5. ADJUSTMENTS (Expenses paid directly by each parent) a. Work-Related Child Care Costs Adjusted for Federal Tax Credit (0.75 x actual work-related child care costs.)$$ b. Extraordinary Medical Expenses (Uninsured only) and Children's Portion of Health Insurance Premium Costs.$$ c. Extraordinary Expenses (Agreed to by parents or by order of the court.)$$ d. Minus Extraordinary Adjustments (Agreed to by parents or by order of court.)-- e. Total Adjustments (For each column, add 5a, 5b, and 5c. Subtract Line 5d. Add the parent's totals together for Combined amount.)$$$ 6. TOTAL SUPPORT OBLIGATION (Add line 4 and line 5e Combined.)  $ 7. EACH PARENT'S SHARE OF THE TOTAL CHILD SUPPORT OBLIGATION (Line 3 x line 6 for each parent.)$$ 8. PAYOR PARENT ADJUSTMENT (Enter payor parent's line 5e.)$$ 9. RECOMMENDED CHILD SUPPORT ORDER (Subtract line 8 from line 7 for the payor parent only. Leave payee parent column blank.)$$ PART II. ABILITY TO PAY CALCULATION(Complete if the payor parent's adjusted monthly gross net pay income is below $2,600.) 10. Spendable Income (0.80 x line 2 for payor parent only.) 11. Self Support Reserve$997$997 12. Income Available for Support (Line 10 - line 11. If less than $50, then $50) 13. Adjusted Child Support Order (Lesser of Line 9 and Line 12.) Comments, calculations, or rebuttals to schedule or adjustments if payor parent directly pays extraordinary expenses. PREPARED BY:Date: §48-13-404. Additional calculation to be made in basic shared parenting cases. In cases where the payor parent's adjusted gross income net pay is below $2,600 per month, an additional calculation in Worksheet A, Part II, §48-13-403 of this code, shall be made. This additional calculation sets the child support order at whichever is lower.(1) Child support at the amount determined in Worksheet A, Part I, §48-13-403 of this code; or(2) The difference between 80 percent of the payor parent's adjusted gross income net pay and $997, or $50, whichever is more. Part 5. Support in extended shared parenting or split physical custody cases. §48-13-502. Extended shared parenting worksheet. Child support for extended shared parenting cases shall be calculated using the following worksheet:Worksheet B: extended shared parentingIN THE FAMILY COURT OF ______________ COUNTY, WEST VIRGINIACASE NO. ____________Mother: ___________________________ SS No.: __________Father: ____________________________ SS No.: __________ ChildrenSSNDate of BirthChildrenSSNDate of Birth PART I. BASIC OBLIGATIONMotherFatherCombined 1. MONTHLY GROSS NET PAY INCOME (Exclusive of overtime compensation)$$ a. Minus preexisting child support payment-- b. Minus maintenance paid-- c. Plus overtime compensation, if not excluded, and not to exceed 50%, pursuant to W. Va. Code §48-1-228(b)(6)++ d. Additional dependent deduction e. Minus student loan payment pursuant to W. Va. Code §48-13-202(3) 2. MONTHLY ADJUSTED GROSS NET PAY INCOME$$$ 3. PERCENTAGE SHARE OF INCOME (Each parent's income from line 2 divided by Combined Income)%%100% 4. BASIC OBLIGATION (Use line 2 Combined to find amount from Child Support Schedule.)  $ PART II. SHARED PARENTING ADJUSTMENT 5. Shared Parenting Basic Obligation (line 4 x 1.6)  $ 6. Each Parent's Share (Line 5 x each parent's line 3)$$ 7. Overnights with Each Parent (must total 365)  365 8. Percentage with Each Parent (Line 7 divided by 365)%%100% 9. Amount Retained (Line 6 x line 8 for each parent)$$ 10. Each Parent's Obligation (Line 6 - line 9)$$ 11. AMOUNT TRANSFERRED FOR BASIC OBLIGATION (Subtract smaller amount on line 10 from larger amount on line 10. Parent with larger amount on line 10 owes the other parent the difference. Enter $0 for other parent.$$ PART III. ADJUSTMENTS FOR ADDITIONAL EXPENSES (Expenses paid directly by each parent.) 12a. Work-Related Child Care Costs Adjusted for Federal Tax Credit (0.75 x actual work-related child care costs.)$$ 12b. Extraordinary Medical Expenses (Uninsured only) and Children's Portion of Health Insurance Premium Costs.$$ 12c. Extraordinary Additional Expenses (Agreed to by parents or by order of the court.)$$ 12d. Minus Extraordinary Adjustments (Agreed to by parents or by order of the court.)$$ 12e. Total Adjustments (For each column, add 12a, 12b, and 12c. Subtract line 12d. Add the parent's totals together for Combined amount.)$$$ 13. Each Parent's Share of Additional Expenses (Line 3 x line 12e Combined.)$$ 14. Each Parent's Net Share of Additional Direct Expenses (Each parent's line 13-line 12e. If negative number, enter $0)$$ 15. AMOUNT TRANSFERRED FOR ADDITIONAL EXPENSES (Subtract smaller amount on line 14 from larger amount on line 14. Parent with larger amount on line 14 owes the other parent the difference. Enter $0 for other parent.)$$ PART IV. RECOMMENDED CHILD SUPPORT ORDER 16. TOTAL AMOUNT TRANSFERRED (Line 11 + line 15)$$ 17. RECOMMENDED CHILD SUPPORT ORDER (Subtract smaller amount on line 16 from larger amount on line 16. Parent with larger amount on line 16 owes the other parent the difference.)$$ Comments, calculations, or rebuttals to schedule or adjustments PREPARED BY:Date: PART 6. ADJUSTMENT OF SHARES OF SUPPORT OBLIGATIONS. §48-13-601. Adjustment for child care tax credit. (a) The amount of the federal tax credit for child care expenses that can be realized by the custodial parent shall be approximated by deducting twenty-five percent from work-related child care costs, except that no such deduction shall be made for custodial parents with monthly gross  net pay incomes below the following amounts:(1) One child--$1,150;(2) Two children--$1,550;(3) Three children--$1,750;(4) Four children--$1,950;(5) Five children--$2,150; and(6) Six or more children--$2,350.(b) Work-related child care costs net of any adjustment for the child care tax credit shall be added to the basic child support obligation and shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross income net pay . §48-13-602. Adjustment for child health care. (a) A child support order shall provide for the child's current and future medical needs by providing relief in accordance with the provisions of article 12-101, et seq., of this chapter.(b) The payment of a premium to provide health insurance coverage on behalf of the children subject to the order is added to the basic child support obligation and divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross income net pay. The amount added to the basic child support obligation is the actual amount of the total insurance premium that is attributable to the number of children due support. If this amount is not available or cannot be verified, the total cost of the premium should be divided by the total number of persons covered by the policy. The cost per person derived from this calculation is multiplied by the number of children who are the subject of the order and who are covered under the policy.(c) After the total child support obligation is calculated and divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross income net pay, the amount of the health insurance premium added to the basic child support obligation is deducted from the support obligor's share of the total child support obligation if the support obligor is actually paying the premium.(d) Extraordinary medical expenses shall be added to the basic child support obligation and shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their adjusted gross income net pay. §48-13-603. Adjustment for obligor's social security benefits sent directly to the child; receipt by child of supplemental security income. (a) If a proportion of the obligor's social security benefit is paid directly to the custodian of his or her dependents who are the subject of the child support order, the following adjustment shall be made. The total amount of the social security benefit which includes the amounts paid to the obligor and the obligee shall be counted as gross income net pay to the obligor. In turn, the child support order will be calculated as described in sections 13-401 through 13-404. To arrive at the final child support amount, however, the amount of the social security benefits sent directly to the child's household will be subtracted from the child support order. If the child support order amount results in a negative amount it shall be set at zero.(b) If a child is a recipient of disability payments as supplemental security income for aged, blind and disabled, under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. §1382, et seq., and if support furnished by an obligor would be considered unearned income that renders the child ineligible for disability payments or medical benefits, no child support order shall be entered for that child. If a support order is entered for the child's siblings or other persons in the household, the child shall be excluded from the calculation of support, and the amount of support for the child shall be set at zero. PART VIII. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS RELATING TO CHILD SUPPORT ORDERS. §48-13-801. Tax exemption for child due support. Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, the court shall allocate the right to claim dependent children for income tax purposes to the payee parent except in cases of extended shared parenting. In extended shared parenting cases, these rights shall be allocated between the parties in proportion to their adjusted gross incomes net pay for child support calculations. In a situation where allocation would be of no tax benefit to a party, the court need make no allocation to that party. However, the tax exemptions for the minor child or children should be granted to the payor parent only if the total of the payee parent's income and child support is greater when the exemption is awarded to the payor parent.